en: Bicycle Kickstands
xx: Bicycle Kickstands
cs: Stojánky na jízdní kola
da: Støtteben til cykler
de: Fahrradständer
es: Patas para bicicletas
fr: Béquilles de vélos
it: Cavalletti per biciclette
ja: 自転車用キックスタンド
nl: Fietsstandaarden
no: Sykkelstøtter
pl: Podpórki rowerowe
pt: Descansos de bicicleta
ru: Откидные подножки для велосипедов
sv: Cykelstöd
tr: Bisiklet Dayama Ayaklıkları

en: Bicycle Saddles
xx: Bicycle Saddles
cs: Sedla kol
da: Cykelsadler
de: Fahrradsättel
es: Sillines para bicicletas
fr: Selles de vélo
it: Selle bici
ja: 自転車サドル
nl: Fietszadels
no: Sykkelseter
pl: Siodełka
pt: Selins para bicicletas
ru: Велосипедные седла
sv: Cykelsadlar
tr: Bisiklet Seleleri

en: Bicycle Seatpost Clamps
xx: Bicycle Seatpost Clamps
cs: Objímky na sedlovky jízdních kol
da: Spændebånd til cykelsadelrør
de: Fahrradsattelstützenklemmen
es: Tijas del tubo regulable del sillín para bicicletas
fr: Colliers de serrage pour tiges de selle de vélo
it: Morsetti asta sella bici
ja: 自転車シートクランプ
nl: Klemmen voor fietszadelkolommen
no: Setepinneklemmer
pl: Zaciski sztycy podsiodłowej
pt: Presilhas do canote do selim de bicicletas
ru: Зажимы велосипедных седлодержателей
sv: Klämmor till cykelsadelstolpar
tr: Bisiklet Sele Kelepçeleri

en: Bicycle Seatposts
xx: Bicycle Seatposts
cs: Cyklistické sedlovky
da: Cykelsadelrør
de: Fahrradsattelstützen
es: Tubos regulables de sillín para bicicletas
fr: Tiges de selle de vélo
it: Aste sella per bicicletta
ja: 自転車シートポスト
nl: Fietszadelkolommen
no: Sykkelsetepinner
pl: Sztyce podsiodłowe
pt: Canotes do selim de bicicletas
ru: Велосипедные седлодержатели
sv: Cykelsadelstolpar
tr: Bisiklet Sele Boruları

en: Bicycle Small Parts
xx: Bicycle Small Parts
cs: Malé díly ke kolům
da: Smådele til cykler
de: Kleinere Fahrradzubehörteile
es: Piezas pequeñas para bicicleta
fr: Petites pièces de vélo
it: Piccole parti bicicletta
ja: 自転車用小型パーツ
nl: Kleine onderdelen voor fietsen
no: Smådeler til sykler
pl: Drobne części rowerowe
pt: Pequenas peças para bicicletas
ru: Мелкие детали для велосипедов
sv: Smådelar till cyklar
tr: Bisiklet Küçük Parçaları

en: Bicycle Stems
xx: Bicycle Stems
cs: Hlavová složení na kola
da: Cykelfrempind
de: Fahrradlenkervorbau
es: Tubos del manillar para bicicletas
fr: Tiges de vélo, Potence de vélo
it: Reggimanubrio per bicicletta
ja: 自転車ハンドルステム
nl: Fietsstuurbevestigingsystemen
no: Sykkelstyrestemer
pl: Mostki rowerowe
pt: Mesas para bicicletas
ru: Велосипедные выносы руля
sv: Cykelstyrstångar
tr: Bisiklet Gidon Boğazları

en: Bicycle Tire Valve Adapters
xx: Bicycle Tire Valve Adapters
cs: Adaptéry na ventilky jízdních kol
da: Adaptere til cykelventiler
de: Reifenventiladapter
es: Adaptadores para válvulas de neumáticos de bicicletas
fr: Adaptateurs pour valves de pneus de vélo
it: Adattatori per valvole per pneumatici di bicicletta
ja: 自転車タイヤ用バルブアダプター
nl: Adapters voor fietsbandventielen
no: Ventiladaptere til sykkelslanger
pl: Przejściówki do wentyli rowerowych
pt: Adaptadores para válvulas de pneus de bicicleta
ru: Адаптеры для велосипедных вентилей
sv: Ventiladaptrar för cyklar
tr: Bisiklet Lastik Supabı Adaptörleri

en: Bicycle Tire Valve Caps
xx: Bicycle Tire Valve Caps
cs: Čepičky na ventilky jízdních kol
da: Hætter til cykelventiler
de: Reifenventilkappen
es: Capuchones para válvulas de neumáticos de bicicletas
fr: Bouchons de valves de pneus de vélo
it: Cappucci per valvole per pneumatici di bicicletta
ja: 自転車タイヤ用バルブキャップ
nl: Dopjes voor fietsbandventielen
no: Ventilhetter til sykkelslanger
pl: Nakrętki na wentyle rowerowe
pt: Tampas para válvulas de pneus de bicicleta
ru: Колпачки для велосипедных вентилей
sv: Ventilhattar för cyklar
tr: Bisiklet Lastik Supabı Kapakları

en: Bicycle Tire Valves
xx: Bicycle Tire Valves
cs: Ventilky na jízdní kola
da: Cykelventiler
de: Reifenventile
es: Válvulas para neumáticos de bicicletas
fr: Valves de pneus de vélo
it: Valvole per pneumatici di bicicletta
ja: 自転車用タイヤバルブ
nl: Fietsbandventielen
no: Ventiler til sykkelslanger
pl: Wentyle rowerowe
pt: Válvulas de pneus de bicicleta
ru: Велосипедные вентили
sv: Däckventiler för cyklar
tr: Bisiklet Lastik Supapları

en: Bicycle Tires
xx: Bicycle Tires
cs: Pláště na kola
da: Cykeldæk
de: Fahrradreifen
es: Neumáticos para bicicletas
fr: Pneus de vélo, Pneu de vélo
it: Gomme per bicicletta
ja: 自転車タイヤ
nl: Fietsbanden
no: Sykkeldekk
pl: Opony rowerowe
pt: Pneus de bicicleta
ru: Велосипедные шины
sv: Cykeldäck
tr: Bisiklet Lastikleri

en: Bicycle Tubes
xx: Bicycle Tubes
cs: Duše na jízdní kola
da: Cykelslanger
de: Fahrradschläuche
es: Cámaras para bicicletas
fr: Tubes de vélo, Chambre à air de vélo
it: Camere d'aria bicicletta
ja: 自転車タイヤチューブ
nl: Binnenbanden
no: Sykkelslanger
pl: Dętki rowerowe
pt: Câmaras para bicicletas
ru: Велосипедные камеры
sv: Cykelslangar
tr: Bisiklet İç Lastikleri

en: Bicycle Wheel Parts
xx: Bicycle Wheel Parts
cs: Díly na kola jízdních kol
da: Cykelhjuldele
de: Fahrradräderzubehör
es: Piezas de ruedas para bicicletas
fr: Pièces pour roues de vélo
it: Parti per ruote bicicletta
ja: 自転車ホイールパーツ
nl: Fietswielonderdelen
no: Deler til sykkelhjul
pl: Części kół rowerowych
pt: Peças de rodas de bicicleta
ru: Детали велосипедного колеса
sv: Delar till cykelhjul
tr: Bisiklet Tekerlek Parçaları

en: Bicycle Foot Pegs
xx: Bicycle Foot Pegs
cs: Stupačky (pegy) na jízdní kola
da: Fodstøtter til cykler
de: Fahrradfußrasten
es: Reposapiés para bicicletas
fr: Repose-pieds de vélo
it: Pedali con dentatura per bicicletta
ja: 自転車用フットペグ
nl: Voetsteunen voor fietsen
no: Fotstøtter til sykkel
pl: Pegi rowerowe
pt: Apoio para os pés para bicicleta
ru: Велосипедные подножки
sv: Fotpinnar för cykel
tr: Bisiklet Ayaklıkları

en: Bicycle Hub Parts
xx: Bicycle Hub Parts
cs: Díly pro náboje kol
da: Cykelnavdele
de: Fahrradnabenteile
es: Repuestos para bicicletas
fr: Pièces de rechange pour moyeux
it: Parti per mozzo di biciclette
ja: 自転車車軸用部品
nl: Naafonderdelen voor fietsen
no: Deler til sykkelnav
pl: Części piast rowerowych
pt: Peças de quadro de bicicleta
ru: Детали велосипедных ступиц
sv: Navdelar till cykelhjul
tr: Bisiklet Göbeği Parçaları

en: Bicycle Hubs
xx: Bicycle Hubs
cs: Náboje pro jízdní kola
da: Cykelnav
de: Fahrradnaben
es: Concentradores para bicicletas
fr: Moyeux de vélo
it: Mozzi per bicicletta
ja: 自転車ハブ
nl: Fietsnaven
no: Sykkelnav
pl: Piasty rowerowe
pt: Eixos para bicicletas
ru: Велосипедные ступицы
sv: Cykelnav
tr: Bisiklet Orta Göbekleri

en: Bicycle Rim Strips
xx: Bicycle Rim Strips
cs: Pásky do ráfků jízdních kol
da: Fælgtape til cykler
de: Felgenbänder
es: Fondos de llanta para bicicletas
fr: Fonds de jante
it: Nastro per cerchioni di bicicletta
ja: 自転車用リムテープ
nl: Velglinten voor fietsen
no: Felgteip til sykler
pl: Opaski na obręcze rowerowe
pt: Fitas protetoras para rodas de bicicleta
ru: Велосипедные ободные ленты
sv: Fälgband för cyklar
tr: Bisiklet Jant Şeritleri

en: Bicycle Spokes
xx: Bicycle Spokes
cs: Paprsky kola
da: Cykeleger
de: Fahrradspeichen
es: Radios para bicicletas
fr: Rayons de vélo, Rayon de vélo
it: Raggi per bicicletta
ja: 自転車スポーク
nl: Fietsspaken
no: Sykkeleiker
pl: Szprychy rowerowe
pt: Raios de bicicleta
ru: Велосипедные спицы
sv: Cykelekrar
tr: Bisiklet Jant Telleri

en: Bicycle Wheel Axles & Skewers
xx: Bicycle Wheel Axles & Skewers
cs: Osy a rychloupínáky na jízdní kola
da: Aksler og quick release til cykler
de: Fahrradachsen & -spanner
es: Ejes y sujeciones rápidas para bicicletas
fr: Arbres de roues
it: Assi e raggi per ruote di bicicletta
ja: 自転車用車軸・スキュワー
nl: Assen en snelspanners voor fietswielen
no: Hjulaksler og -spindler til sykkel
pl: Osie i szprychy do rowerów
pt: Eixos de rodas de bicicleta
ru: Оси и эксцентрики для велосипедных колес
sv: Hjulaxlar och snabbkopplingar för cykelhjul
tr: Bisiklet Tekerlek Aksları

en: Bicycle Wheel Nipples
xx: Bicycle Wheel Nipples
cs: Matice paprsku kola
da: Nipler til cykelhjul
de: Speichennippel
es: Conectores para ruedas de bicicletas
fr: Écrous pour rayons de vélo
it: Cappucci valvola bicicletta
ja: 自転車ホイールニップル
nl: Fietswielnippels
no: Sykkelhjulnipler
pl: Nyple rowerowe
pt: Bocais roscados para rodas de bicicleta
ru: Велосипедные ниппели
sv: Nipplar till cykelhjul
tr: Bisiklet Jant Teli Vidaları

en: Bicycle Wheel Rims
xx: Bicycle Wheel Rims
cs: Ráfky na kola
da: Cykelfælge
de: Fahrradfelgen
es: Llantas de rueda para bicicletas
fr: Jantes de vélo, Jante de vélo
it: Cerchi ruote bicicletta
ja: 自転車ホイールリム
nl: Fietswielvelgen
no: Sykkelhjulfelger
pl: Obręcze rowerowe
pt: Aros para rodas de bicicletas
ru: Ободы велосипедных колес
sv: Cykelfälgar
tr: Bisiklet Jantları